Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB119.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 7 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a part to read:PART IIICOMMUNITY REINVESTMENTChapter71. Community Reinvestment by Banks72. Community Reinvestment by Nonbank EntitiesCHAPTER 71COMMUNITY REINVESTMENT BY BANKSSec.7101. Definitions.7102. Duties of banks.7103. Duties of department.12345678910111213141516171819 7104. Community reinvestment notice.7105. Assessment of banks.7106. Lists of banks by department.7107. Transaction approval.§ 7101. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Bank." A banking institution as defined under section 6102 (relating to definitions). The term does not include a special purpose bank that does not perform commercial or retail banking services in which credit is granted to the public in the ordinary course of business, other than as an incident to the special purpose bank's specialized operations, including, but not limited to, banker's banks and banks that engage only in providing cash management controlled disbursement services or serving as correspondent banks, trust companies or clearing agents."Community reinvestment laws." The provisions of 12 U.S.C. Ch. 30 (relating to community reinvestment), and the regulations adopted by the Federal financial supervisory agencies as provided under 12 CFR Ch. I Pt. 25 (relating to Community Reinvestment Act and interstate deposit production regulations), Ch. II Subch. A Pt. 228 (relating to community reinvestment (regulation BB)) and Ch. III Subch. B Pt. 345 (relating to community reinvestment), as applicable to the specific type of bank."Community reinvestment performance." The performance of a nonbank entity in helping to meet the credit needs of the community credit union's entire community, including low-income 20250SB0119PN0070 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 neighborhoods and moderate-income neighborhoods."Department." The Department of Banking and Securities of the Commonwealth."Federal financial supervisory agency." The Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and any successor to such agencies, as applicable to the specific type of bank.§ 7102. Duties of banks.(a) Local communities.--Each bank shall, in accordance with the provisions of community reinvestment laws and without excluding low-income neighborhoods and moderate-income neighborhoods, delineate the local community or communities that comprise the bank's entire community within this Commonwealth or delineate one or more assessment areas, as applicable, within which the department shall evaluate the bank's record of helping to meet the credit needs of the entire community. The department shall review the delineation for compliance with community reinvestment laws and this subsection in connection with an examination of the bank under section 401 of the act of May 15, 1933 (P.L.565, No.111), known as the Department of Banking and Securities Code.(b) Loan information.--Each bank shall collect and report loan information in accordance with the applicable requirements of community investment laws. Each bank shall file with the department a copy of each disclosure statement prepared for the bank by a Federal financial supervisory agency under community investment laws within 30 business days of receiving the statement.(c) Public access.--Copies of the public section of the most 20250SB0119PN0070 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 recent community reinvestment performance evaluation prepared by the department under section 7105(b)(2) (relating to assessment of banks) shall be provided to the public by mail, upon request. A bank may charge a reasonable fee not to exceed the cost of copying and mailing, if applicable.(d) Public file.--Each bank shall maintain a public file in accordance with community reinvestment laws. Each bank shall place a copy of the public section of the bank's most recent community reinvestment performance evaluation prepared by the department under section 7105(b)(2) in the public file within 30 business days of receipt from the department. The bank may also include in the public file any response to the community reinvestment performance evaluation. The bank shall make a copy of the public section of the community reinvestment performance evaluation available to the public for inspection upon request and at no cost at the bank's main office and at each of the bank's branches in this Commonwealth. A bank that received a less than satisfactory rating during the bank's most recent examination under section 7105 shall include in its public file a description of the bank's current efforts to improve performance in helping to meet the credit needs of the entire community. The bank shall update the description quarterly.(e) Strategic plan.--The department may assess a bank's record of helping to meet the credit needs of the bank's assessment areas under a strategic plan under community reinvestment laws, provided the strategic plan is filed with the department concurrently with the strategic plan's submission by the bank to a Federal financial supervisory agency for approval under community reinvestment laws, and the strategic plan is approved by the department.20250SB0119PN0070 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 7103. Duties of department.The department shall assess the record of each bank in satisfying the bank's continuing and affirmative obligations to help meet the credit needs of the bank's local communities, including low-income neighborhoods and moderate-income neighborhoods and shall provide for the consideration of the records in connection with an application considered under section 7105(c) (relating to assessment of banks).§ 7104. Community reinvestment notice.(a) Public notice.--Except as provided in subsection (d), each bank shall provide, in the public lobby of each of its offices, a public notice substantially similar to the one provided in this subsection and subsection (b). Bracketed material shall be used only by a bank having more than one local community.COMMUNITY REINVESTMENT NOTICECommunity reinvestment requires the evaluation of our performance in helping to meet the credit needs of this community, and to take this evaluation into account when the Pennsylvania Department of Banking and Securities decides on certain applications submitted by us.Your involvement is encouraged.You should know that:You may obtain our current Community Reinvestment Statement for this community in this office. (Current Community Reinvestment Statements for other communities served by us are available at our main office, located at:.....................................)You may send signed, written comments about our Community Reinvestment Statement or our performance in helping to meet 20250SB0119PN0070 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 community credit needs to (title and address of bank official) and to the Department of Banking and Securities (address). Your letter, together with any responses by us, may be made public.You may look at a file of all signed, written comments received by us within the past two years, any response we have made to the comments and all Community Reinvestment Statements in effect during the past two years at our office located at (address). You also may look at the file about this community at (name and address of designated office).You may ask to look at any comments received by the Department of Banking and Securities.(b) Subsidiaries.--If the bank is a subsidiary of a holding company, the following provision shall be included in the community reinvestment notice required under subsection (a):We are a subsidiary of (name of holding company), a (bank/savings and loan) holding company. You may request from the (Federal Reserve Bank) of (address) an announcement of applications covered by the community reinvestment statement filed by holding companies.(c) Most recent evaluations.--Except as provided in subsection (d)(2), within 30 business days of receiving the most recent community reinvestment performance evaluation prepared by the department or a Federal financial supervisory agency, each bank shall add the following provision to the community reinvestment notice required under subsection (a):You may obtain the public section of our most recent community reinvestment performance evaluation at (name and address of main office and designated community office).20250SB0119PN0070 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Additional notice.--(1) On and after July 1, 2023, in addition to the public notice required under community reinvestment laws, each bank shall provide in the public lobby of its main office and each of its branches in this Commonwealth a public notice substantially similar to the following:COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIACOMMUNITY REINVESTMENT NOTICEThe Pennsylvania Department of Banking and Securities evaluates our record of helping to meet the credit needs of this community. The Department of Banking and Securities also takes this record into account when deciding on certain applications submitted by us.Your involvement is encouraged.In addition to the information that you are entitled to receive under the Federal Community Reinvestment Act, as listed in the "Community Reinvestment Act Notice" posted in this lobby, you may review today the public section of our most recent community reinvestment performance evaluation prepared by the Department of Banking and Securities.You may send written comments about our performance in helping to meet community credit needs to the Department of Banking and Securities (address). Your letter, together with any response by us, will be considered by the Department of Banking and Securities in evaluating our community reinvestment performance and may be made public.You may ask to look at any comments received by the Department of Banking and Securities.(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a), (b) and (c), prior to July 1, 2023, a bank may use the form 20250SB0119PN0070 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of public notice provided under paragraph (1) in lieu of the form of public notice provided under subsections (a), (b) and (c), if the use is consistent with the form of public notice required to be used by the bank under community reinvestment laws.(e) Combination of notices.--The information, statements, evaluations and notices required under this section and section 7102(e) (relating to duties of banks) may be combined with or attached to the information, statements, evaluations and notices required under community reinvestment laws.§ 7105. Assessment of banks.(a) Factors.--The department shall assess the record of the performance of the bank in helping to meet the credit needs of the bank's entire community, including low-income neighborhoods and moderate-income neighborhoods. The department shall assess the community reinvestment performance of a bank utilizing the applicable methodology provided in community reinvestment laws. In addition, the department shall consider the following in assessing a bank's record of performance:(1) The bank's record of offering escrow accounts for purposes of paying property taxes.(2) Efforts of the bank to work with delinquent residential mortgage customers who are unemployed or underemployed to facilitate a resolution of the delinquency.(3) The fair housing efforts of the bank in collaboration with State and local agencies.(4) The bank's record relating to abusive practices that result in the loss of affordable housing.(5) Written comments received by the department.(b) Community reinvestment performance evaluation.--20250SB0119PN0070 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Upon the conclusion of the assessment required under subsection (a), the department shall prepare a written evaluation of the bank's record of meeting the credit needs of the bank's entire community, including low-income neighborhoods and moderate-income neighborhoods. Each community reinvestment performance evaluation prepared under this subsection shall have a public section and a confidential section.(2) The public section of the community reinvestment performance evaluation shall:(i) State the department's assessment of the community reinvestment performance of the bank utilizing the applicable methodology provided under community reinvestment laws.(ii) Discuss the facts supporting the assessment.(iii) Contain the bank's rating and a statement describing the basis for the rating. The rating shall be one of the following:(A) outstanding record of meeting community credit needs;(B) high satisfactory record of meeting community credit needs;(C) low satisfactory record of meeting community credit needs;(D) needs to improve record of meeting community credit needs; or(E) substantial noncompliance in meeting community credit needs.(3) The department shall provide a copy of the public portion of the community reinvestment performance evaluation 20250SB0119PN0070 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to the bank upon completion of the evaluation.(4) The confidential section of the performance evaluation shall contain all references that identify any customer of the bank, any employee or officer of the bank or any person that has provided information in confidence to the department or to any Federal financial supervisory agency. The confidential section shall also contain any statements obtained or made by the department in the course of an examination which, in the judgment of the department, are too sensitive or speculative in nature to disclose to the bank or the public. The confidential section may be disclosed, in whole or in part, to the bank if the department determines that the disclosure will promote the objectives of this chapter, except that no disclosure shall identify a person that has provided information in confidence to the department or to any Federal financial supervisory agency.(c) Consideration of applications.--In considering an application for the establishment of a branch or other facility with the ability to accept deposits, the relocation of the main office or a branch office or a merger or consolidation with or the acquisition of assets or stock or assumption of liabilities of another bank, the department shall consider, but not be limited to considering, the bank's record of performance. A bank's record of performance in helping to meet the credit needs of the bank's community may be the basis for denying or conditioning such an application.(d) Rules and regulations.--The department may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this section.§ 7106. Lists of banks by department.The department shall annually prepare and submit to the State 20250SB0119PN0070 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Treasurer a list of banks which have received a rating of low satisfactory or lower in connection with the community reinvestment performance evaluation prepared by the department under section 7105 (relating to assessment of banks) or by a Federal financial supervisory agency pursuant to community reinvestment laws, whichever evaluation is made available most recently. No bank included on the list may receive deposits from the State Treasurer. In preparing the list, the department may rely on information received from a Federal financial supervisory agency.§ 7107. Transaction approval.(a) Compliance requirement.--(1) The department may not grant any approval under the act of November 30, 1965 (P.L.847, No.356), known as the Banking Code of 1965, unless the department finds that:(i) Based on the most recent applicable performance evaluation and any related information required by the department, the entity has a record of compliance with the requirements of community reinvestment laws, this chapter, to the extent applicable, and applicable consumer protection laws.(ii) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if the entity, and, in the case of an approval, the bank or any subsidiary bank of the holding company, received any overall rating other than an assigned rating of high satisfactory or higher on the most recent applicable community reinvestment performance evaluation, the resulting entity will provide adequate services to meet the banking needs of all community residents, including low-income residents and moderate-20250SB0119PN0070 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 income residents, to the extent permitted by its charter, in accordance with the strategic plan submitted by the applicant to the department in a form and containing the information as the department may require or, if acceptable to the department, in accordance with an approved strategic plan prepared under community reinvestment laws that is submitted by the applicant to the department.(2) Upon receiving the strategic plan, the department shall make the plan available for public inspection and comment at the department. The department shall transmit notice of the plan's submission and availability for inspection to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and provide for public comments. With the concurrence of the department, the applicant shall publish, in the form of a legal advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation, notice of the plan's submission and availability for public inspection and comment. The notice shall state that the inspection and comment period will last for a period of 30 days from the date of publication. The department shall not make the finding until the expiration of the 30-day period.(3) In making the finding, the department shall, unless clearly inapplicable, consider, among other factors, whether the plan:(i) identifies specific unmet credit and consumer banking needs in the local community;(ii) specifies how credit and consumer banking needs will be satisfied;20250SB0119PN0070 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) provides for sufficient distribution of banking services among branches or satellite devices, or both, located in low-income neighborhoods;(iv) contains adequate assurances that banking services will be offered on a nondiscriminatory basis; and(v) demonstrates a commitment to extend credit for housing, small business and consumer purposes in low-income neighborhoods.(4) The submission of the plan shall not be required in the case of an approval under the Banking Code of 1965, if the department requires the filing of the information in lieu of a plan. If the department determines that an applicant is an eligible entity, the department may exempt the applicant from the requirement that the applicant file a plan or require the information in lieu of a plan.(5) The department shall not approve the transaction if the transaction would result in a monopoly or would be in furtherance of any combination or conspiracy to monopolize or attempt to monopolize the business of banking in this Commonwealth, or if the department determines that the effect of the proposed transaction may be to substantially lessen competition, would tend to create a monopoly or would be in restraint of trade, unless the department finds that the anticompetitive effects of the proposed transaction are clearly outweighed in the public interest by the probable effect of the transaction in meeting the convenience and needs of the community to be served.(b) Determination by department.--(1) The department shall not make a determination 20250SB0119PN0070 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 stating that the department does not disapprove an offer, invitation, request, agreement or acquisition unless the department finds that:(i) Based on the most recent applicable performance evaluation and any related information required by the department, the acquiring person, if the person is a bank, and the acquiring person's subsidiaries, if the person is a holding company, has a record of compliance with the requirements of community reinvestment laws, this chapter, to the extent applicable, and applicable consumer protection laws.(ii) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if the bank or any banking subsidiary of the holding company referred to in the acquisition statement received any overall rating other than an assigned rating of high satisfactory or higher on its most recent applicable community reinvestment performance evaluation, the bank or banking subsidiary shall provide adequate services to meet the banking needs of all community residents, including low-income residents and moderate-income residents, to the extent permitted by its charter or charters.(2) If the acquiring person is not an individual, or if the acquiring person is an individual who would be the beneficial owner of 25% or more of any class of voting securities of the bank or holding company referred to in the acquisition statement, the finding as to the adequacy of services to be provided shall be based on a plan submitted by the acquiring person to the department, in a form and containing the information as the department may require, or, 20250SB0119PN0070 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 if acceptable to the department, in accordance with an approved strategic plan prepared under community reinvestment laws, or the relevant portion thereof, that is submitted by the acquiring person to the department.(3) Upon receiving the plan, the department shall make the plan available for public inspection and comment at the department's office. The department shall transmit notice of the plan's submission and the availability for inspection to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and provide for public comment. With the concurrence of the department, the acquiring person shall publish, in the form of a legal advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation, notice of the plan's submission and availability for public inspection and comment. The notice shall state that the inspection and comment period will last for a period of 30 days from the date of publication. The department shall not make a finding until the expiration of the 30-day period.(4) (i) In making the finding, the department shall consider, among other factors, whether the plan:(A) identifies specific unmet credit and consumer banking needs in the local community;(B) specifies how the credit and consumer banking needs will be satisfied;(C) provides for sufficient distribution of banking services among branches or satellite devices, or both, located in low-income neighborhoods;(D) contains adequate assurances that banking services will be offered on a nondiscriminatory basis; and20250SB0119PN0070 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (E) demonstrates a commitment to extend credit for housing, small business and consumer purposes in low-income neighborhoods.(ii) The department may exempt an acquiring person from the requirement that the acquiring person file a plan if the department determines that the bank or banking subsidiary referred to in the acquisition statement is an eligible entity.(5) If the acquiring person is an individual who would be the beneficial owner of less than 25% of all classes of voting securities of the bank or holding company referred to in the acquisition statement, the department shall make the finding as to adequacy of services to be provided based on the commitment of the acquiring person to use the acquiring person's best efforts to cause the bank or banking subsidiaries of the holding company to provide the services. The department shall not make a determination stating that the department does not disapprove the offer, invitation, request, agreement or acquisition if the offer, invitation, request, agreement or acquisition would result in a monopoly or would be in furtherance of any combination or conspiracy to monopolize or attempt to monopolize the business of banking in this Commonwealth, or if the department should determine that the effect of the proposed offer, invitation, request, agreement or acquisition may be to substantially lessen competition, would tend to create a monopoly or would be in restraint of trade, unless the department finds that the anticompetitive effects of the proposed transaction are clearly outweighed in the public interest by the probable effect of the transaction in meeting the convenience and 20250SB0119PN0070 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 needs of the community to be served.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Eligible entity." An entity which:(1) Received a composite rating of one or two under the Uniform Financial Institutions Rating System as a result of the entity's most recent safety and soundness examination.(2) Received a compliance rating of one or two on the entity's most recent compliance examination.(3) Received a satisfactory or better rating on the entity's most recent community reinvestment performance evaluation.(4) Is well capitalized, as defined in 12 CFR 324.403(b)(1) (relating to capital measures and capital category definitions).(5) Is not subject to a cease and desist order, consent order, prompt correction action directive, written agreement, memorandum of understanding or other administrative agreement with the entity's primary Federal or State banking regulator.(6) Is not subject to any formal or informal administrative action by the entity's primary Federal or State banking regulator.CHAPTER 72COMMUNITY REINVESTMENT BY NONBANK ENTITIESSec.7201. Definitions.7202. Community reinvestment.7203. Community reinvestment performance evaluation.7204. Community reinvestment notice.20250SB0119PN0070 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 7205. Effect on certain approvals.7206. Lists of nonbank entities by department.§ 7201. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Assessment area." One or more of the geographic areas as delineated by a community credit union that:(1) Consists of one or more metropolitan statistical areas or one or more contiguous political subdivisions, including, but not limited to, counties, cities or towns.(2) Includes geographies in which the community credit union has a principal office, subsidiary offices and share-taking automated teller machines.(3) Includes the surrounding geographies in which the community credit union originates or purchases a substantial portion of loans."Community credit union." A Pennsylvania credit union which has $10,000,000 or more in total assets and the membership of which is limited to persons within a well-defined community, neighborhood or rural district."Community reinvestment performance." The performance of a nonbank entity in helping to meet the credit needs of the community credit union's entire community, including low-income neighborhoods and moderate-income neighborhoods."Mortgage broker." As defined under section 6102 (relating to definitions)."Mortgage lender." As defined under section 6102."Nonbank entity." A community credit union, a mortgage broker and a mortgage lender.20250SB0119PN0070 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 7202. Community reinvestment.(a) Credit needs.--Each nonbank entity shall satisfy its continuing and affirmative obligation to help meet the credit needs of its community, including low-income neighborhoods and moderate-income neighborhoods.(b) Evaluation.--Not later than January 1, 2023, each nonbank entity shall delineate one or more assessment areas within which the department shall evaluate the nonbank entity's community reinvestment performance in this Commonwealth and shall file the delineations with the department. An assessment area shall consist only of whole geographies and may not reflect illegal discrimination, arbitrarily exclude low-income geographies or moderate-income geographies or extend substantially beyond a consolidated metropolitan statistical area boundary or beyond a state boundary, unless the assessment area is located in a multistate metropolitan statistical area. A nonbank entity may adjust the boundaries of the nonbank entity's assessment areas to include only the portion of a political subdivision that the nonbank entity reasonably can be expected to serve. A nonbank entity shall immediately file an amendment with the department reflecting an adjustment of the boundaries of an assessment area.(c) Periodic assessment.--The department shall assess periodically the community reinvestment performance of a nonbank entity. The department shall assess the community reinvestment performance of the nonbank entity based on the following:(1) The nonbank entity's record of helping to meet the credit needs of the assessment area or areas through qualified investments that benefit the nonbank entity's assessment area or areas or a broader Statewide or regional 20250SB0119PN0070 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 area that includes the nonbank entity's assessment area or areas.(2) The nonbank entity's record of helping to meet the credit needs of the assessment area or areas, by analyzing both the availability and effectiveness of the nonbank entity's systems for delivering retail credit union services and the extent and innovativeness of the nonbank entity's community development services.(3) The loan-to-share ratio given the nonbank entity's size and financial condition, credit needs of the assessment area or areas and other lending-related activities, considering seasonal variations, as used in 12 CFR 228.26 (relating to limited purpose banks).(4) The percentage of total loans and other lending-related activities within the assessment area or areas.(5) The record of lending and other lending-related activities to borrowers of different income levels and businesses and farms of different sizes.(6) The geographic distribution of loans.(7) The action taken in response to written complaints with respect to community reinvestment performance.(8) The efforts of the nonbank entity to work with delinquent residential mortgage customers who are unemployed or underemployed to facilitate a resolution of the delinquency.(9) The written comments received by the department.(d) Community reinforcement performance evaluation.--(1) Upon the completion of the assessment required under subsection (c), the department shall prepare a written evaluation of the nonbank entity's community reinvestment 20250SB0119PN0070 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 performance.(2) (i) The community reinvestment performance evaluation shall:(A) State the department's assessment of the community reinvestment performance of the nonbank entity.(B) Provide and discuss the facts supporting the assessment.(C) Contain the nonbank entity's rating and a statement describing the basis for the rating. The rating shall be one of the following:(I) outstanding record of meeting community credit needs;(II) high satisfactory record of meeting community credit needs;(III) low satisfactory record of meeting community credit needs;(IV) needs to improve record of meeting community credit needs; or(V) substantial noncompliance in meeting community credit needs.(ii) The department shall furnish a copy of the community reinvestment performance evaluation to the nonbank entity upon completion.§ 7203. Community reinvestment performance evaluation.(a) Public access.--Each nonbank entity shall provide to the public, by mail, upon request, copies of the most recent community reinvestment performance evaluation prepared by the department under section 7202 (relating to community reinvestment). A community credit union may charge a reasonable 20250SB0119PN0070 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 fee not to exceed the cost of copying and mailing, if applicable.(b) Public file.--Each nonbank entity shall maintain a public file in which it shall place, not later than 30 business days after receipt from the department, a copy of the nonbank entity's most recent community reinvestment performance evaluation prepared by the department under section 7202. The nonbank entity may also include in the public file any response to the community reinvestment performance evaluation that the nonbank entity makes. The nonbank entity shall make a copy of the community reinvestment performance evaluation available to the public for inspection upon request and at no cost at the nonbank entity's principal office and at each of its subsidiary offices in this Commonwealth. A nonbank entity that receives a rating of "low satisfactory record of meeting community credit needs" or lower on its most recent evaluation shall include in the public file a description of the nonbank entity's current efforts to improve its performance in helping to meet the credit needs of the entire community. The nonbank entity shall update the description quarterly until it receives a "high satisfactory record of meeting community needs" or better rating from the department.§ 7204. Community reinvestment notice.Each nonbank entity shall provide in the public lobby of its principal office and each of its subsidiary offices in this Commonwealth a public notice substantially similar to the following:COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIACOMMUNITY REINVESTMENT NOTICEThe Pennsylvania Department of Banking and Securities 20250SB0119PN0070 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 evaluates our record of helping to meet the credit needs of this community. The Department of Banking and Securities may also consider this record when deciding on certain applications submitted by us.Your involvement is encouraged.You may review today our most recent community reinvestment performance evaluation prepared by the Department of Banking and Securities.You may send written comments about our community reinvestment performance to the Department of Banking and Securities (address). Your comments, together with any response by us, will be considered by the Department of Banking and Securities in evaluating our community reinvestment performance and may be made public.You may ask to look at any comments received by the Department of Banking and Securities.§ 7205. Effect on certain approvals.(a) Considerations.--The department may consider the community reinvestment performance of a nonbank entity in connection with the following:(1) An approval of an amendment to the certificate of incorporation under 17 Pa.C.S. (relating to credit unions).(2) An approval of an expansion of the nonbank entity's field of membership under 17 Pa.C.S.(3) An approval of a merger under 17 Pa.C.S.(b) Withhold or condition approval.--The department may withhold approval of or condition an issuance of approval of the amendment, expansion or merger under this section.§ 7206. Lists of nonbank entities by department.(a) List.--The department shall annually prepare and submit 20250SB0119PN0070 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to the State Treasurer a list of nonbank entities that the department rated in a community reinvestment performance evaluation prepared under section 7202 (relating to community reinvestment) as follows:(1) "low satisfactory record of meeting community credit needs";(2) "needs to improve record of meeting community credit needs"; or(3) "substantial noncompliance in meeting community credit needs."(b) Prohibition.--A nonbank entity included on the list may not receive money under the provisions of 17 Pa.C.S. (relating to credit unions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 365 days.20250SB0119PN0070 - 24 - 1234567891011121314